Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-547
Class II or Class III school district; school board; board of education; members; number.

(1) The school board or board of education shall consist of the following members:

(a) In a Class II district, six members; and

(b) In a Class III district, six members unless the board of education provides a nine-member board pursuant to section 79-550.

(2) In addition to the members specified in subsection (1) of this section, such school boards or boards of education may include one or more student members selected pursuant to section 79-559.

Laws 1969, c. 257, § 37, p. 951;

Laws 1982, LB 440, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-516.04;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 300.